Nebraska statutes.
Revised Statutes Cumulative Supplement, 201859-1404
Copyright owner; assigns; licensees; benefits.

Upon compliance with the Music Licensing Agency Act, the copyright owner, and his or her assigns and licensees, of a nondramatic musical work copyrighted under the laws of the United States shall be entitled to all the benefits thereof.

Laws 1945, c. 139, § 4, p. 440;

Laws 2018, LB1120, § 38.
July 19, 2018